Washington statutes.
RCW 27.54.050

Annual report. (Expires June 30, 2027.)

The semiquincentennial committee shall submit a yearly report of its activities to the legislature.

[ 2022 c 97 s 5.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2022 c 97: See note following RCW 27.54.010.